South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S652.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 17, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 2.  Section 56-1-171 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 3.  Any person whose driver's license was revoked pursuant to Article 7, Chapter 17, Title 63 or who is operating a vehicle with a route-restricted driver's license issued pursuant to Section 56-1-171 as of the effective date of this act may apply for a driver's license. The driver's license shall be issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles provided that the person meets all other requirements for a driver's license. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----